New York, session 2025-2026, A3713.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 7.51 to read as follows: 3 § 7.51 Support team assisted response pilot program. 4 (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of crimi- 5 nal justice services, commissioner of health, New York state emergency 6 medical services council and local authorities, shall establish a 7 support team assisted response pilot program in any city with a popu- 8 lation of one million or more for the purpose of providing emergency 9 response services for mental health, substance use and other public 10 health emergencies. Such pilot program shall: 11 (i) establish a process where mental health professionals and emergen- 12 cy medical technicians are dispatched by the 911 emergency assistance 13 system to provide free medical care, first aid, or mental health support 14 for non-criminal emergencies including but not limited to overdoses, 15 suicidal individuals, individuals experiencing mental health crises, and 16 intoxication; 17 (ii) establish a training program for such mental health professionals 18 and emergency medical technicians to respond to such non-criminal emer- 19 gencies; and 20 (iii) coordinate activities and promote cooperation and collaboration 21 between the office, program participants and the local community. 22 (b) Eighteen months after the effective date of this section, the 23 commissioner shall submit a report to the governor, the temporary presi- 24 dent of the senate and the speaker of the assembly on the effectiveness 25 of this pilot program. Such report shall include: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06479-01-5 A. 3713 2 1 (i) a review of all agencies that have participated in the program and 2 the number of individuals that have completed training; 3 (ii) an analysis of the impact of the program on local communities 4 including the number of times participants have been dispatched, the 5 types of emergency calls, the care provided and the outcomes of such 6 emergency calls; 7 (iii) an analysis of any logistical challenges and the costs associ- 8 ated with such program and recommendations for improvement; 9 (iv) a plan for statewide expansion of the program; and 10 (v) any recommendations for additional legislative enactments that may 11 be needed or required, to improve, enhance and subsequently expand the 12 program as determined to be appropriate by the commissioner. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law.